District of Columbia statutes.
47-2853.143

Certain representations prohibited.

Unless licensed under this subchapter, no person shall use the term or words “property manager” to imply that he or she is licensed as a property manager in the District.

History

Apr. 20, 1999, D.C. Law 12-261, § 1002, 46 DCR 3142

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 47-2853.143.